District of Columbia statutes.
4-407

Collection of overpayments.

An overpayment by the Department to a child development center, child development home, or to an in-home caregiver who is continuing to provide day care services shall be collectible in any amount.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 8, 26 DCR 20

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-307.
1973 Ed., § 3-307.